Maryland, session 2026, SB0692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–110.
(a) The Secretary shall disapprove an application for a dealer’s license if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0692*

SENATE BILL 692
(1) the Secretary determines that the applicant supplied false information
or made a false statement;
(2) the Secretary determines that the application is not properly
completed;
(3) the Secretary receives a written notification from the applicant’s
licensed attending physician that the applicant suffers from a mental disorder and is a
danger to the applicant or to another; [or]
(4) the Secretary determines that the applicant intends that a person who
is not eligible to be issued a dealer’s license or whose dealer’s license has been revoked or
suspended:
(i) will participate in the management or operation of the business
for which the license is sought; or
(ii) holds a legal or equitable interest in the business for which the
license is sought; OR
(5) THE APPLICANT HAS FAILED TO COMPLETE THE TRAINING OR
SATISFACTORILY PASS THE WRITTEN EXAM REQUIRED UNDER § 5–145.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
5–145.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY A
LICENSED DEALER, WHETHER OR NOT FOR COMPENSATION, AND WHOSE DUTIES
INCLUDE:
(1) HANDLING FIREARMS WITHIN THE LICENSED DEALER’S PLACE OF
BUSINESS; OR
(2) SELLING OR TRANSFERRING FIREARMS.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027:
(1) BEFORE AN INDIVIDUAL MAY APPLY TO BECOME A LICENSED
DEALER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL COMPLETE THE TRAINING
AND SATISFACTORILY PASS THE WRITTEN EXAM DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION
(D) OF THIS SECTION;

SENATE BILL 692 3
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A LICENSED DEALER ANNUALLY SHALL
COMPLETE THE TRAINING AND SATISFACTORILY PASS THE WRITTEN EXAM
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(3) WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS HIRED
AS AN EMPLOYEE, AND ANNUALLY THEREAFTER, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL COMPLETE
THE TRAINING AND SATISFACTORILY PASS THE WRITTEN EXAM DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT
TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 IMPOSED BY THE SECRETARY.
(D) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) APPROVE AT LEAST ONE TRAINING COURSE THAT:
(I) MAY BE COMPLETED USING THE INTERNET;
(II) INCLUDES WRITTEN TRAINING MATERIALS; AND
(III) PROVIDES INSTRUCTION ON:
1. STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS REGULATING THE
TRANSFER OF FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION;
2. PREVENTING AND REPORTING TO LAW
ENFORCEMENT THE THEFT OF FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION;
3. TEACHING CUSTOMERS FIREARM SAFETY, INCLUDING
SAFE STORAGE AND HANDLING OF FIREARMS; AND
4. RECOGNIZING AND REPORTING TO LAW
ENFORCEMENT SIGNS OF:
A. STRAW PURCHASES;
B. FIREARM TRAFFICKING;
C. FRAUDULENT ACTIVITY;
D. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO INTENDS TO USE A FIREARM FOR
AN UNLAWFUL PURPOSE OR SELF–HARM; AND

SENATE BILL 692
E. ANY OTHER SUBJECT THE SECRETARY DETERMINES
IS APPROPRIATE; AND
(2) OFFER A WRITTEN MULTIPLE CHOICE EXAM TESTING THE
SUBJECTS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) (I) THE EXAM DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST 20 QUESTIONS.
(II) THE SECRETARY MAY NOT LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TIMES
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY ATTEMPT THE EXAM.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL FIND THAT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS
CORRECTLY ANSWERED AT LEAST 70% OF THE EXAM QUESTIONS HAS
SATISFACTORILY PASSED THE EXAM AND SHALL ISSUE THE INDIVIDUAL A
CERTIFICATE STATING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SATISFACTORILY PASSED THE
EXAM.
(3) A LICENSED DEALER SHALL MAINTAIN AT THE LICENSED
DEALER’S PLACE OF BUSINESS A COPY OF EACH CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE
SECRETARY TO THE LICENSED DEALER AND THE LICENSED DEALER’S EMPLOYEES
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.